ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Accesorii audio > Accesorii pentru căști audio și căști audio cu microfon > Pernițe și dopuri pentru căști: Pernițe pentru căști; Dopuri pentru căști
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audioaccessoires > Accessoires voor oor- en hoofdtelefoons > Oorschelpkussens en oortips: Oorschelpkussens; Oortips
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Accessoires audio > Accessoires pour écouteurs et casques audio > Embouts et mousses pour écouteurs: Mousses pour écouteurs; Embouts pour écouteurs
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiozubehör > Kopfhörer- & Headset-Zubehör > Kopfhörer- & In-Ear-Ohrhörer-Polster: Kopfhörerpolster; Kopfhörergummis
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio dodatki > Dodatki za slušalke in naglavne slušalke > Ušesne blazinice in čepki za slušalke: Ušesne blazinice za slušalke; Čepki za slušalke
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオアクセサリー > ヘッドフォン・ヘッドセット関連用品 > ヘッドフォンクッション・チップ: ヘッドフォンクッション; ヘッドフォンチップ
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Accessories > Headphone & Headset Accessories > Headphone Cushions & Tips: Headphone Cushions; Headphone Tips
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音響配件 > 耳機配件 > 耳機耳套/皮罩: 耳機耳套; 耳機皮罩
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiolaitteet > Kuulokkeet ja kuuloketarvikkeet > Kuuloketyynyt ja -pehmusteet: Kuuloketyynyt; Kuulokepehmusteet
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频配件 > 头戴式耳机配件 > 耳机罩/耳机套: 耳机罩; 耳机套
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre slúchadlá a náhlavné súpravy > Vankúšiky a štuple na slúchadlá: Vankúšiky na slúchadlá; Štuple na slúchadlá
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 부대용품 > 헤드폰/헤드셋 부대용품 > 헤드폰 쿠션/팁: 헤드폰 쿠션; 헤드폰 팁
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio pribor > Pribor za slušalice i slušalice s mikrofonom > Jastučići i gumice za slušalice: Jastučići za slušalice; Gumice za slušalice
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso priedai > Ausinių ir ausinių su mikrofonais priedai > Ausinių pagalvėlės ir antgaliai: Ausinių pagalvėlės; Ausinių antgaliai
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Αξεσουάρ ήχου > Αξεσουάρ ακουστικών & headset > Μαξιλαράκια & άκρα ακουστικών: Μαξιλαράκια ακουστικών; Άκρα ακουστικών
it: Elettronica > Audio > Accessori audio > Accessori per cuffie e auricolari > Gommini e copriauricolari: Gommini per cuffie; Punte per cuffie
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Akcesoria audio > Akcesoria do słuchawek i zestawów słuchawkowych > Poduszki i nakładki do słuchawek: Poduszki do słuchawek; Nakładki do słuchawek
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Acessórios para áudio > Acessórios para fones de ouvido > Protetores e almofadas para fones de ouvido: Almofadas para fones de ouvido; Protetores para fones de ouvido
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Aksesuarları > Kulaklık Aksesuarları > Kulaklık Yastıkları ve Uçları: Kulaklık Yastıkları; Kulaklık Uçları
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > อุปกรณ์ทางเสียง > อุปกรณ์หูฟังและชุดหูฟัง > ที่หุ้มและปลายของหูฟัง: ที่หุ้มหูฟัง; ปลายหูฟัง
es: Electrónica > Audio > Accesorios de audio > Accesorios para auriculares > Almohadillas para auriculares y gomas para auriculares de tapón: Almohadillas para auriculares; Gomas para auriculares
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkiegészítők > Fejhallgató és fülhallgató-kiegészítők > Fejhallgatópárnák és -hegyek: Fejhallgatópárnák; Fejhallgatóhegyek
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиоаксесоари > Аксесоари за слушалки > Възглавнички и накрайници за слушалки: Възглавнички за слушалки; Гумички за слушалки
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lyd – tilbehør > Tilbehør til hovedtelefoner og headsets > Ørepuder til hovedtelefoner: Puder til hovedtelefoner; Hovedtelefonspidser
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Phụ kiện âm thanh > Phụ kiện tai nghe > Đệm và đầu mút tai nghe qua đầu: Đệm tai nghe chụp tai; Đầu mút tai nghe chụp tai
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvuková zařízení – příslušenství > Příslušenství ke sluchátkům a náhlavním soupravám > Náušníky ke sluchátkům: Náušníky pro sluchátka; Náhradní špunty na sluchátka
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydtilbehør > Tilbehør til hodetelefoner og headset > Puter og tupper til hodetelefoner: Puter til hodetelefoner; Tupper til hodetelefoner
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudtillbehör > Tillbehör till hörlurar och headsets > Hörlurskuddar och hörlursadaptrar: Hörlurskuddar; Hörlursadaptrar
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Аксессуары для аудиотехники > Аксессуары для наушников и гарнитур > Амбушюры и вкладыши для наушников: Амбушюры для наушников; Вкладыши для наушников
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Acessórios de áudio > Acessórios de auscultadores e auriculares > Pontas e almofadas para auscultadores: Almofadas para auscultadores; Pontas para auscultadores